Utah statutes.
76-8-804.   Attempts to commit crimes of sabotage.

Whoever attempts to commit any of the crimes defined by this part shall be punishable for the attempt as prescribed in Section 76-4-102. In addition to the acts which constitute an attempt to commit crime under the law of this state, the solicitation or incitement of another to commit any of the crimes defined by this part not allowed by the commission of the crime, the collection or assemblage of any materials with the intent that they are to be used then or at a later time in the commission of the crime, or the entry, with or without permission, of a building, enclosure or other premises of another with the intent to commit any such crime therein or thereon shall constitute an attempt to commit the crime.

